Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Statewide Trauma System Act, the definitions found in sections 71-8204 to 71-8235 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 3.